North Dakota, session 69, HB1600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Immigration law clinic.
1. The university of North Dakota school of law shall employ one full-time staff attorney for the
immigration law clinic. The immigration law clinic attorney may not have more than sixty
matters open at any one time.
2. Legal services may be provided and legal work may be done remotely, depending on the
needs of the client.
3. The university of North Dakota school of law may charge nominal fees, as needed, to operate
the immigration law clinic.
SECTION 2. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA SCHOOL OF LAW - IMMIGRATION LAW
CLINIC - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The university of North Dakota school of law shall
prepare a report on the status of the immigration law clinic, including the impact of the operation of the
immigration law clinic on the university of North Dakota school of law, the sustainability of the clinic
based on fee collections, the number of law students interested in participating in the clinic, the number
of law students participating in the clinic, and the number of student hours of involvement. The report
must also include the number of businesses, employers, and individuals seeking legal services, the
location of the individuals or entities seeking services, and the scope of work requested. The report
must also identify any obstacles encountered in developing the clinic, potential future challenges for the
clinic, a detailed plan to meet these challenges, and any legislation necessary to support the
recommendations for the clinic's successful operation. The university of North Dakota school of law
shall present the report to the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET - IMMIGRATION LAW CLINIC - ONE-TIME FUNDING.
There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and improvements fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $400,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the office of management and budget for the purpose of providing a grant to the university
of North Dakota to fund an immigration law clinic at the university of North Dakota school of law, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The appropriation provided in this section
is considered a one-time funding item.

H. B. NO. 1600 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1600.
House Vote: Yeas 64 Nays 29 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 34 Nays 13 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State